src/twolcErz.twolc
!!!Depricated due to 
!!ERROR: Label not found in 'EQV_LABELS' (114) **
!!Solved in several contexts by declaring both lexical
!!and surface forms in the alphabet.
"G1:0 sometimes"
Г1:0 <= :vows (К3:0)  %^:0 _ а:я ;

"G1:0 always"
Г1:0 => [ :vows (К3:0) | :к :0* ]  %^:0 _ а: ;

"G1:g"
Г1:г  <=> [ ConsVoicedDent ( :ь | У4:0 | У3:0 | И3:0 | Ы3:0) | й И3:0 | [ ConsVoicedNonDent - г ] ( :ь | У3:0 | И3:0 | Ы3:0) ] %^:0 _ а ;

"G1:k sometimes"
Г1:к  <=  [ ConsVoicelessDent ( :ь | И3:0 | У3:0 | Ы3:0 | У4:0 | У4:ь | О1:0) | [ ConsVoicelessNonDent - к ] (У3:0 | И3:0 | Ы3:0) | г (У3:0 | И3:0 | Ы3:0) | К4:0 ] %^:0 _ а  ;

"G1:k always"
Г1:к  =>  [ ConsVoicelessDent ( :ь | И3:0 | У3:0 | Ы3:0 | У4:0 | У4:ь | О1:0) | ConsVoicelessNonDent (У3:0 | И3:0 | Ы3:0) | г (У3:0 | И3:0 | Ы3:0) | К4:0 ] :0* %^:0 _ а  ;
          

!Prolative
"G2:g"
Г2:г  <=> [ ConsVoicedDent ( :ь | И3: | У3:0 | Ы3:0) | [ ConsVoicedNonDent - г ] ( :ь | И3: | У3:0 | Ы3:0) ] %^:0 _ а ;

"G2:v"! 
Г2:в  <=> [ :vows ( :0) %^:0 | У2:о %^:0 | И2:е %^:0 ] _ а [ .#. | %^:0 [ Г1:0 | Poss | т | н | с | д: | в | к с | л ] ];


"G2:k"
Г2:к  <=>  [ ConsVoicelessDent ( :ь | И3: | У3:0 | Ы3:0) | ConsVoicelessNonDent ( :ь | И3: | У3:0 | Ы3:0) | г (И3:0 | У3:0) ] %^:0 _ а [ .#. | %^:0 [ Г1:0 | Poss | т | н | с | д: | в | к с | л ] ] ;
           vows ConsVoiceless [ У2:0 | И2:0 ] %^:0 _ а ;

!!Depricated
"G3:g" !Imperative Clitics
Г4:г  <=> з ь %^:0 _ а ;
!!
!!!
"G4:0"
Г4:0  <=>
           К1: %^:0 _ а ;
  [ О1:е | О1:о ] %^:0 _ а: ;
!
!
"G4:k"
Г4:к  <=>  .#. [ и л я | у ж о | а з ё | а д я | а й д а ] %^:0 _ а  ;


"m:0" 
м:0 <=> 
 subseqBack  _ У2:0  %^:0  VLoss: [ т | т н е:э ] ;
        т (ь) _ [ У2: | И2: ]  %^:0  VLoss: [ с (т) [ О1:э | О1:о | О1:0 ] | с [ .#. | %^:0 [ Г1:0 | Г1:к ] ] ] ;



!! imperative suffix
"K1:t"
К1:т <=>  [ И1:0 | И1:ь | У1:0 | Ы1:0 ] %^:0 _  ;



! Suffix final hard vs soft
!Removing "Ы1:0" 17.04.2007
!Adding "И2:0" 18.04.2007
"U4:y"
У4:ь  <=>  
[ [ %^:0 [ О1:е | О1:э ] |  :subseqFront ] %^:0 ( О1: )  [ т | н ] | FrontSoftStem  %^:0 [( О1: ) т | О1: н ] | [ :ь | И3:0 | ь:0 | :subseqFront ] %^:0 т | [ И1:ь | И1:0 | :subseqFront ] %^:0 :т | И2:е %^:0 т ]  _  [ .#. | %^:0 [ Г1:г | Г1:к ] ] ;


!Ablative d/t
"d:t"
д:т  <=> [ ConsVoiceless | д | г ] [ ь:0 | И3:0 | Ы3:0 | У3:0 ]  %^:0 _ [ О1:е | О1:э | О1:о | О1:0 ] ;
         т [ У2:0 | И2:0 ] %^:0 VLoss:0  _ [ О1:е | О1:э | О1:о ] ;
!Word final Vowels



"U2:0"
У2:0 <=>  _ %^:0 VLoss:0 [ т [ У4:0 | н е: | А2:а ] | с (т) [ О1:о | О1:0 ] | с [ %^:0 |  .#. ] | д:т [ О1:о | О1:е | О1:э ]  ] ;
          _ %^:0  А2:а ;


"U2:o"
У2:о  <=>  _ [ %^:0 [ т [ У4:0 | У4:ь ] | т н е: | с ь: | с (т) [ О1:о | О1:0 ] | с [ %^:0 |  .#. ] | л  ] | [ (н) з [ О1:о | О1:0 ] | ш к а | к с | н | в | Г2:в | д | с т [ %^:0 |  .#. ] | Г1:0 ] |  .#. ] ;


"YI2:y"
И2:ь  <=>  ConsDent _ %^:0 VLoss:0 [ с (т) [ О1:э | О1:0 ] | с [ %^:0 |  .#. ] ] ;

"YI2:ye"
И2:е  <=>   _ [ %^:0 [ т [ У4:0 | У4:ь ] | т н е | с ь: | с (т) [ О1:э | О1:0 | ь: ] | с [ %^:0 |  .#. ] | л ] | [ (н) з [ О1:э | О1:0 ] | ш к а | к с | н | в | д | с т [ %^:0 |  .#. ] | Г1:0 ] |  .#. ] ;


"YI2:0 always"
И2:0 <=> Cons _ %^:0 VLoss:0 т [ У4:0 | У4:ь | н е: | А2:я [ д | н ] ] ;
         ConsNonDent: _ %^:0 VLoss:0 [ с (т) [ О1:э | О1:0 ] | с [ %^:0 |  .#. ] ] ;
           т _  %^:0 VLoss:0 д:т [ О1:е | О1:0 ] ;
         vows ConsVoiceless _ %^:0 VLoss:0 Г2:к а ;
         [ ConsBack | й:0 ] _ %^:0  А2:я ;


!Disallow

"Disallow vows Y3"
У3:0 /<= vows _ ;  

"Disallow vows consequtive O1"
О1:0 /<= :vows %^:0 О1:  %^:0 _ ;  
